Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-213
Township; names; recording.

The county clerk shall record in a book kept for that purpose the names and boundaries of each town as designated by the county board, and shall forthwith forward an abstract thereof to the Auditor of Public Accounts of this state, who shall make a record of the same.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 11, p. 134;

R.S.1913, § 997;

C.S.1922, § 899;

C.S.1929, § 26-213;

R.S.1943, § 23-213.

Road district is not a political entity. Townships may sue road overseers for breach of duty. Town of Denver v. Myers, 63 Neb. 107, 88 N.W. 191 (1901).